Utah statutes.
76-10-1108.   Seizure and disposition of gambling debts or proceeds.

Any gambling bets or gambling proceeds which are reasonably identifiable as having been used or obtained in violation of this part may be seized and are subject to forfeiture proceedings in accordance with Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.



Amended by Chapter 180, 2007 General Session

